Nebraska, session 109, LB323.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 39-1348, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
39-1348 (1) Except as otherwise provided in sections 39-2808 to 39-2823,
when letting contracts for the construction, reconstruction, improvement,
maintenance, or repair of roads, bridges, and their appurtenances, the
department shall solicit bids as follows:
(a)(i) (a) For contracts with an estimated cost, as determined by the
department, of greater than two hundred fifty thousand dollars, the department
shall provide notice of the department's solicitation of advertise for sealed
bids using the following methods: for not less than twenty days by publication
of a notice thereof
(A) Publish notice once a week for three consecutive weeks in the official
county newspaper designated by the county board in the county where the work is
to be done and in such additional newspaper or newspapers as may appear
necessary to the department in order to give notice of the receiving of bids;
and .
(B) Publish notice on the official web page designated by the department
beginning at least twenty days before the deadline for receipt of bids. The
notice will be deemed to comply with this requirement even if there are
temporary or occasional times when Internet service is down or the designated
web page is not available for any reason.
(ii) Such notice advertisement shall identify the general project
location, state the place where the plans and specifications for the work may
be inspected, and shall designate the time when the bids shall be filed and
opened. The newspaper notice shall identify the department's official web page
where the details of the bid letting may be viewed electronically.
(iii) The notice requirements of this section shall be deemed to have been
met if notice of the bid solicitation has been published on the department's
designated web page for at least twenty days prior to the time when bids will
be opened, even if there is any defect with the newspaper notice described in
subdivision (1)(a)(i)(A) of this section, including, but not limited to,
meeting a publication deadline that has been moved by the publisher resulting
in an inability to satisfy the requirement of three consecutive weeks of
published notice.
(iv) If through no fault of the department publication of such notice
fails to appear as prescribed in subdivisions (1)(a)(i) and (ii) of this
section in any newspaper or newspapers in the manner provided in this
subdivision, the department shall be deemed to have fulfilled the requirements
of this subdivision; and
(b) For contracts with an estimated cost, as determined by the department,
of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or less, the department, in its sole
discretion, shall either:
(i) Follow the procedures given in subdivision (a) of this subsection; or
(ii) Request bids from at least three potential bidders for such work. If
the department requests bids under this subdivision, it shall designate a time
when the bids shall be opened. The department may award a contract pursuant to
this subdivision if it receives at least one responsive bid.
(2) The Department of Transportation may adjust the amounts in
subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of this section annually on October 1 by the
percentage change in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published
by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, at the
close of the twelve-month period ending on August 31 of such year. The amounts
shall be rounded to the next highest one-thousand-dollar amount.
Sec. 2. Section 39-1355, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
39-1355 (1) The department shall have authority to:
(a) Purchase purchase, lease, employ, or acquire by other means, all
needed road materials, machinery, equipment, supplies, services, and labor
necessary for the construction, reconstruction, maintenance, and control of the
state highway system and all tools and materials necessary to keep such
machinery and equipment in repair; and
(b) Lease . The department shall also have authority to lease, purchase,
construct, or cause to be constructed, buildings for office accommodations,
which are necessary in the administration of the duties of the department, and
buildings for the storing and housing of materials, machinery, equipment, and
-1-

LB323 LB323
2025 2025
supplies.
(2) The department shall not ; Provided, that the department may not
construct or cause to be constructed any building with an estimated cost
greater than the adjusted dollar amount established for capital construction
projects in section 81-1114.01 exceeding a cost of one hundred thousand dollars
without the consent of the Legislature.
(3) The maintenance, protection, and control of the materials, machinery,
equipment, supplies, tools, and buildings shall be under the authority and
responsibility of the department.
Sec. 3. Original section 39-1355, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and section 39-1348, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-2-